Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1406.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 4122. Title or deed fraud.(a) Offense defined.--A person commits the offense of deed fraud if the person:(1) fraudulently obtains or attempts to obtain a title, deed or other instrument affecting another's interest in real property;(2) knowingly records, transmits to a third party or offers in evidence a forged or fraudulent document relating to title or other interest in real property in the course of <--1234567891011121314151617 any proceedings involving a deed or other instrument affecting title or interest in real property;(3) makes or uses a forged or digitally or electronically altered instrument or writing relating to a deed or other interest in real property that is subsequently used in connection with or entered in the records of a register of titles;(4) takes or fraudulently conceals any instrument affecting title or other interest in real property;(5) alters, creates, changes or mutilates by any means, including digitally or electronically, any writing, deed or instrument affecting title or other interest in real property; or(6) makes any false oath or affidavit with respect to any interest in real property.(b) Grading.--A person who commits an offense under subsection (a) shall be guilty of a felony of the second degree.(c) Remedy for victim.--(1) In addition to any other remedy that may be available at law or in equity, an owner of real property may bring an action against an individual who has knowingly and unlawfully filed, entered or recorded, or caused to be filed, entered or recorded, in a public record a false or forged deed or other instrument purporting to convey the owner's interest to the real property to an individual or a third party or purporting to encumber the owner's interest in real property to recover:(i) the owner's actual damages caused by the filing, entering or recording of a false or forged deed or other instrument or $5,000, whichever is greater;20250HB1406PN1980 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (ii) the owner's incurred costs in bringing the action, including reasonable attorney fees; and(iii) any realty transfer taxes paid under State or local law that were incurred as a result of an offense committed under subsection (a).(2) In addition to restitution awarded under section 1106 (relating to restitution for injuries to person or property), the court shall award attorney fees and costs to a victim related to resolving or restoring competing property interests in real property.(3) Nothing in this subsection shall be construed as creating a cause of action against a public official or employee, including a recorder of deeds or an employee or agent of a recorder of deeds, for actions taken in the lawful performance of the public official's or employee's duties.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.AMENDING TITLE 18 (CRIMES AND OFFENSES) OF THE PENNSYLVANIA CONSOLIDATED STATUTES, IN THEFT AND RELATED OFFENSES, FURTHER PROVIDING FOR GRADING OF THEFT OFFENSES.THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE COMMONWEALTH OF PENNSYLVANIA HEREBY ENACTS AS FOLLOWS:SECTION 1. SECTION 3903(A) OF TITLE 18 OF THE PENNSYLVANIA CONSOLIDATED STATUTES IS AMENDED BY ADDING A PARAGRAPH TO READ:§ 3903. GRADING OF THEFT OFFENSES.(A) FELONY OF THE SECOND DEGREE.--THEFT CONSTITUTES A FELONY OF THE SECOND DEGREE IF:* * *(6) THE THEFT OR ATTEMPTED THEFT INVOLVES THE TITLE, DEED OR WRITING RELATED TO AN INTEREST IN REAL PROPERTY REGARDLESS OF THE VALUE.* * *20250HB1406PN1980 - 3 - <--12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728293031 SECTION 2. THIS ACT SHALL TAKE EFFECT IN 60 DAYS.20250HB1406PN1980 - 4 - 1